Tennessee, session 114, SB0616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(16) The sale or offering for sale of any food that contains a live vaccine.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-102, is amended by adding the
following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Live vaccine" means a weakened form of a virus or bacteria intended for
use in humans to stimulate the production of antibodies and provide immunity against
disease;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0616
002515
- 1 -